en: Evaporative Coolers
xx: Evaporative Coolers
cs: Odpařovací ochlazovače vzduchu
da: Vandkøleanlæg
de: Verdunstungskühler
es: Enfriadores por evaporación
fr: Climatiseurs à évaporation
it: Refrigeratori a evaporazione
ja: 蒸発式冷却器
nl: Dampkoelers
no: Fordampingskjølere
pl: Systemy chłodzenia wyparnego
pt: Climatizadores evaporativos
ru: Испарительные охладители
sv: Förångarkylare
tr: Buharlı Soğutucular

en: Fans
xx: Fans
cs: Větráky
da: Blæsere
de: Ventilatoren
es: Ventiladores
fr: Ventilateurs
it: Ventole
ja: 扇風機・ファン
nl: Ventilatoren
no: Vifter
pl: Wentylatory
pt: Ventiladores
ru: Вентиляторы
sv: Fläktar
tr: Vantilatörler

en: Ceiling Fans
xx: Ceiling Fans
cs: Stropní větráky
da: Loftventilatorer
de: Deckenventilatoren
es: Ventiladores de techo
fr: Ventilateurs de plafond
it: Ventole da soffitto
ja: シーリングファン
nl: Plafondventilatoren
no: Takvifter
pl: Wentylatory sufitowe
pt: Ventiladores de teto
ru: Потолочные вентиляторы
sv: Takfläktar
tr: Tavan Vantilatörleri

en: Desk & Pedestal Fans
xx: Desk & Pedestal Fans
cs: Stolní a sloupové ventilátory
da: Skrivebords- og gulvventilatorer
de: Tisch- & Standventilatoren
es: Ventiladores de pie y de sobremesa
fr: Ventilateurs de table et à pied
it: Ventole da tavolo e piedistallo
ja: 卓上扇風機・スタンド型扇風機
nl: Staande en bureauventilatoren
no: Skrivebords- og sokkelvifter
pl: Wentylatory biurkowe i stojące
pt: Ventiladores de mesa e pedestal
ru: Настольные и напольные вентиляторы
sv: Bordsfläktar
tr: Masaüstü ve Ayaklı Vantilatörler

en: Powered Hand Fans & Misters
xx: Powered Hand Fans & Misters
cs: Ruční ventilátory
da: Håndventilatorer
de: Handventilatoren
es: Atomizadores y ventiladores de mano eléctricos
fr: Ventilateurs portatifs et brumisateurs
it: Nebulizzatori e ventilatori personali portatili
ja: 携帯型小型扇風機
nl: Draagbare ventilators
no: Batteridrevne håndvifter med og uten vann
pl: Wentylatory ręczne
pt: Ventilador de mão
ru: Ручные вентиляторы
sv: Handhållna fläktar
tr: Kişisel El Tipi Vantilatörler ve Soğutucu Buhar Cihazları

en: Ventilation Fans
xx: Ventilation Fans
cs: Ventilátory
da: Udluftningsventilatorer
de: Lüftungsventilatoren
es: Ventiladores extractores
fr: Ventilateurs industriels
it: Ventilatori
ja: 換気扇
nl: Uitlaatventilatoren
no: Ventilasjonsvifter
pl: Łopaty wentylatorów
pt: Exaustores
ru: Вытяжные вентиляторы
sv: Ventilationsfläktar
tr: Havalandırma Vantilatörleri

en: Wall Mount Fans
xx: Wall Mount Fans
cs: Nástěnné ventilátory
da: Vægventilator
de: Wandventilatoren
es: Ventiladores de pared
fr: Ventilateurs muraux
it: Ventilatori a parete
ja: 壁掛け式扇風機
nl: Wandventilatoren
no: Veggmonterte vifter
pl: Wentylatory ścienne
pt: Ventiladores de parede
ru: Настенные вентиляторы
sv: Väggmonterade fläktar
tr: Duvara Monte Vantilatörler

en: Furnaces & Boilers
xx: Furnaces & Boilers
cs: Kotle
da: Fyr og kedler
de: Öfen & Kessel
es: Calderas
fr: Fourneaux et chaudières
it: Caldaie e scaldabagno
ja: ボイラー
nl: Verwarmingsketels en boilers
no: Fyrkjeler og varmtvannsberedere
pl: Piece i bojlery
pt: Fornalhas e caldeiras
ru: Печи и котлы
sv: Elpannor och värmepannor
tr: Ocaklar ve Kazanlar

en: Heating Radiators
xx: Heating Radiators
cs: Topná tělesa
da: Radiatorer
de: Radiatoren
es: Radiadores
fr: Radiateurs, Radiateur électrique, Chauffage électrique
it: Radiatori riscaldamento
ja: オイルヒーター
nl: Verwarmingsradiatoren
no: Radiatorer
pl: Kaloryfery
pt: Radiadores para aquecimento
ru: Обогреватели
sv: Värmeelement
tr: Kaloriferler

en: Humidifiers
xx: Humidifiers
cs: Zvlhčovače
da: Vandfordampere
de: Luftbefeuchter
es: Humidificadores
fr: Humidificateurs
it: Umidificatori
ja: 加湿器
nl: Bevochtigers
no: Luftfuktere
pl: Nawilżacze
pt: Umidificadores
ru: Увлажнители
sv: Luftfuktare
tr: Nemlendiriciler

en: Outdoor Misting Systems
xx: Outdoor Misting Systems
cs: Venkovní výrobníky mlhy
da: Udendørs fugtsystemer
de: Fog-Anlagen für den Außenbereich
es: Sistemas de vaporización exteriores
fr: Brumisateurs d'extérieur
it: Sistemi per la nebulizzazione da esterno
ja: 屋外冷却噴霧システム
nl: Mistsystemen voor buitengebruik
no: Utendørs tåkesystemer
pl: Zewnętrzne systemy mgielne
pt: Sistemas de umidificação ao ar livre
ru: Уличные генераторы тумана
sv: Dimmaskiner för utomhusbruk
tr: Açık Alan Serinletme Sistemleri

en: Patio Heaters
xx: Patio Heaters
cs: Venkovní ohřívače
da: Terrassevarmere
de: Terrassenstrahler
es: Estufas para terrazas
fr: Chauffages d'extérieur
it: Riscaldatori terrazza
ja: パラソルヒーター
nl: Terrasverwarmers
no: Utendørsovner
pl: Ogrzewacze ogrodowe
pt: Aquecedores de terraço
ru: Уличные обогреватели
sv: Terrassvärmare
tr: Şemsiye Sobalar

en: Space Heaters
xx: Space Heaters
cs: Teplomety
da: Varmeapparater
de: Raumheizgeräte
es: Calentadores de ambiente
fr: Appareils de chauffage
it: Stufe
ja: 室内暖房器具
nl: Ruimteverwarming
no: Varmeovner
pl: Piecyki przenośne
pt: Aquecedores portáteis
ru: Обогреватели помещений
sv: Rumsuppvärmare
tr: Elektrikli Sobalar

en: Floor & Carpet Dryers
xx: Floor & Carpet Dryers
cs: Vysoušeče koberců a podlah
da: Gulv- og tæppetørrere
de: Boden- & Teppichtrockner
es: Secadoras de suelos y alfombras
fr: Séchoirs pour sols et tapis
it: Asciugatori per pavimenti e tappeti
ja: 床・カーペット用乾燥機
nl: Vloer- en tapijtdrogers
no: Gulv- og teppetørkere
pl: Suszarki do podłóg i dywanów
pt: Secadores de piso e carpete
ru: Сушилки для полов и ковров
sv: Golv- och mattorkare
tr: Halı ve Kilim Kurutucular

en: Floor & Steam Cleaners
xx: Floor & Steam Cleaners
cs: Čističe podlah a parní čističe
da: Tæpperensere
de: Teppich- & Dampfreinigungsgeräte
es: Limpiadores de vapor de alfombras y suelos
fr: Nettoyeurs de sols et vapeur
it: Pulitrici a vapore e lavapavimenti
ja: カーペット用スチームクリーナー
nl: Tapijtstomers
no: Gulv og damprensere
pl: Myjki parowe do dywanów
pt: Limpadores de carpete a vapor
ru: Пароочистители для ковров
sv: Maskiner för ångrengöring av mattor
tr: Zemin Temizleyiciler ve Buharlı Temizleyiciler

en: Carpet Shampooers
xx: Carpet Shampooers
cs: Šamponový čistič na koberce
da: Tæppeshampoomaskiner
de: Teppichshampoos
es: Limpiadores de alfombras con detergente
fr: Shampouineuses à moquette
it: Lavatappeti con detergente
ja: カーペット洗浄機
nl: Tapijtshampoo
no: Teppesjamponeringsmaskiner
pl: Odkurzacze piorące
pt: Limpadores para carpete
ru: Устройства для мытья ковров
sv: Mattschamponerare
tr: Şampuanlı Halı Yıkama Makineleri

en: Carpet Steamers
xx: Carpet Steamers
cs: Parní čistič na koberce
da: Damprensere til tæpper
de: Teppich-Dampfreiniger
es: Limpiadores de alfombras a vapor
fr: Nettoyeurs vapeur pour moquette
it: Pulitori a vapore per tappeti
ja: カーペットスチーマー
nl: Tapijtreinigers
no: Damptepperensere
pl: Odkurzacze parowe
pt: Vaporizadores para carpete
ru: Пароочистители для ковров и пола
sv: Ångtvättar för mattor
tr: Buharlı Halı Yıkama Makineleri

en: Floor Scrubbers
xx: Floor Scrubbers
cs: Čističe podlahy
da: Skuremaskiner til gulvet
de: Bodenschrubber
es: Abrillantadoras
fr: Autolaveuses
it: Lavasciuga per pavimenti
ja: フロアスクラバー
nl: Vloerschrobbers
no: Gulvskrubbemaskiner
pl: Szorowarki do podłóg
pt: Equipamentos para limpeza de chão
ru: Поломоечные машины
sv: Golvskrubbar
tr: Zemin Temizleme Makineleri

en: Steam Mops
xx: Steam Mops
cs: Parní mopy
da: Dampmopper
de: Dampfmopps
es: Mopas a vapor
fr: Balais vapeur
it: Lavapavimenti a vapore
ja: スチームモップ
nl: Stoomreinigers
no: Dampmopper
pl: Mopy parowe
pt: Vaporizador de pisos
ru: Паровые швабры
sv: Ångmoppar
tr: Paspas Buharlı Temizlik Makineleri

en: Floor Polishers & Buffers
xx: Floor Polishers & Buffers
cs: Čističe a leštiče podlah
da: Gulvpolering
de: Bohner- & Poliermaschinen
es: Pulidoras de suelos
fr: Polisseuses à plancher
it: Lucidatrici e pulitrici pavimenti
ja: 床洗浄機
nl: Boen- en polijstmachines voor vloeren
no: Bonemaskiner
pl: Polerki do podłóg
pt: Polidores de piso
ru: Полотеры
sv: Maskiner för vaxning och polering av golv
tr: Zemin Cilalayıcılar ve Perdahlayıcılar